Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6137
Construction of act.

Nothing contained in the Mutual Insurance Holding Company Act shall be construed to prohibit demutualization of a mutual insurance holding company pursuant to the Insurers Demutualization Act.

Laws 1997, LB 740, § 16.

Insurers Demutualization Act, see section 44-6101.